Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4039.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section. 1. Repeal Section 25-318.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 25, chapter 3, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section 25-318.03, to read: START_STATUTE25-318.03. Human embryos; disposition; definitions A. IF a proceeding described in section 25-318, subsection A involves the disposition of in vitro human embryos and the parties have entered into a written agreement regarding the disposition of the in vitro human embryos that are the subject of the written agreement, the court shall award the in vitro human embryos as prescribed in the written agreement. B. If the parties have not entered into a written agreement regarding the disposition of in vitro human embryos or if the written agreement is unclear, the court shall weigh and balance the respective interest of the parties and shall award the in vitro human embryos based on the court's determination of parties' respective interests. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "human embryo" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2311. 2. "In Vitro" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2311. END_STATUTE